Hawaii statutes.
[§161-49] Enforcement. (a) Inspectors
shall enforce this chapter and related rules adopted by the department.

(b) Inspectors shall be provided with suitable
badges or insignia of office by the department, and shall have power to detain
or impound poultry or poultry product that is in violation of this chapter.
The division head of the division of animal industry of the department or the
division head's designees shall have the power to serve and execute warrants in
all matters relating to the poultry inspection laws, to issue a citation for
any violation of this chapter and related rules. [L 1986, c 207, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next